ko: 칠판 표면: 자기식; 매끄러운; 전통; 기타
hu: Krétatábla felülete: Mágneses; Sima; Hagyományos; Egyéb
pl: Powierzchnia tablicy: Magnetyczny; Gładki; Tradycyjny; Inne
ja: 黒板の表面: 磁気; スムース; 従来の; その他
bg-BG: Повърхност на дъска за тебешир: Магнитна; Гладка; Традиционна; Други
lt-LT: Lentos paviršius: Magnetinė; Tolygi; Tradicinė; Kita
sk-SK: Povrch tabule: Magnetický; Hladký; Tradičný; Iné
es: Superficie de la pizarra: Magnético; Suave; Traditional; Otros
cs: Povrch křídové tabule: Magnetická; Hladký; Tradiční; Jiné
fr: Surface du tableau noir: Magnétique; Lisse; Traditionnel; Autre
ru: Покрытие меловой доски: Магнит; Гладкий; Традиционный; Другое
sl-SI: Površina kredne table: Magnetno; Gladka; Tradicionalno; Drugo
fi: Liitutaulun pinta: Magneettinen; Sileä; Perinteinen; Muu
hr-HR: Površina ploče za pisanje kredom: Magnetna; Glatka; Tradicionalna; Ostalo
it: Superficie della lavagna: Magnetico; Liscio; Tradizionale; Altro
de: Tafeloberfläche: Magnetisch; Glatt; Traditionell; Sonstiges
da: Tavleoverflade: Magnetisk; Glat; Traditionel; Andet
tr: Kara tahta yüzeyi: Manyetik; Pürüzsüz; Geleneksel; Diğer
nb: Tavleoverflate: Magnetisk; Glatt; Tradisjonell; Annet
vi: Bề mặt bảng đen: Từ tính; Nhẵn; Truyền thống; Khác
zh-TW: 黑板表面: 磁性; 光滑; 傳統的; 其他
th: พื้นผิวกระดานดำ: แม่เหล็ก; เรียบ; แบบดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 黑板面: 磁力; 光滑; 传统; 其他
sv: Griffeltavelyta: Magnetisk; Slät; Traditionell; Övrigt
ro-RO: Suprafață tablă: Magnetic; Netedă; Tradițională; Altele
nl: Oppervlak krijtbord: Magnetisch; Glad; Traditioneel; Andere
pt-BR: Superfície do quadro-negro: Magnética; Suave; Tradicional; Outro
pt-PT: Superfície de quadro negro: Magnético; Macio; Tradicional; Outro
en: Chalkboard surface: Magnetic; Smooth; Traditional; Other
el: Επιφάνεια μαυροπίνακα: Μαγνητικό; Ήπια; Παραδοσιακή; Άλλο